zh-TW: 警車裝備套件: 社區巡邏套件; 偵查/行政套件; 公路巡邏套件; 警犬部隊套件; 有標誌巡邏車套件; 追捕級套件; 學校駐警套件; 無車頂排燈套件; 主管套件; 交通執法套件; 運送/囚犯套件; 無標誌套件; 其他
ro-RO: Pachet de echipamente pentru vehicule de poliție: Pachet poliție de proximitate; Pachet detectiv/administrativ; Pachet patrulă de autostradă; Pachet unitate K-9; Pachet patrulă inscripționată; Pachet pentru urmăriri; Pachet ofițer de siguranță școlară; Pachet fără rampă luminoasă (slicktop); Pachet supervizor; Pachet poliție rutieră; Pachet transport/deținuți; Pachet vehicul neinscripționat; Altele
it: Pacchetto di equipaggiamento per veicoli delle forze dell'ordine: Pacchetto polizia di prossimità; Pacchetto investigativo/amministrativo; Pacchetto polizia stradale; Pacchetto unità cinofila; Pacchetto pattuglia con contrassegni; Pacchetto idoneo per inseguimenti; Pacchetto agente scolastico; Pacchetto tetto liscio; Pacchetto supervisore; Pacchetto controllo del traffico; Pacchetto trasporto/prigionieri; Pacchetto auto civetta; Altro
tr: Polis aracı ekipman paketi: Toplum polisliği paketi; Dedektif/idari paket; Otoyol devriyesi paketi; K-9 birimi paketi; İşaretli devriye paketi; Takip sınıfı paket; Okul güvenlik görevlisi paketi; Slicktop (tepe lambasız) paket; Amir paketi; Trafik denetim paketi; Nakil/mahkum paketi; Sivil paket; Diğer
ko: 경찰차 장비 패키지: 지역 경찰 패키지; 형사/행정 패키지; 고속도로 순찰대 패키지; K-9 유닛 패키지; 마킹 순찰차 패키지; 추격용 패키지; 학교 전담 경찰관 패키지; 슬릭탑 패키지; 관리자 패키지; 교통 단속 패키지; 이송/수감자 패키지; 언마킹 패키지; 기타
ru: Комплект полицейского оборудования автомобиля: Комплектация для участковой полиции; Комплектация для детективов/административного персонала; Комплектация для дорожного патруля; Комплектация для кинологического подразделения; Патрульная комплектация с маркировкой; Комплектация для преследования; Комплектация для школьного инспектора; Комплектация без световой панели на крыше; Комплектация для руководителя; Комплектация для контроля дорожного движения; Комплектация для транспортировки/перевозки задержанных; Комплектация без маркировки; Другое
sv: Utrustningspaket för polisfordon: Närpolispaket; Kriminal-/administrativt paket; Trafikpolispaket; Hundenhetspaket; Målat patrullpaket; Utryckningspaket; Skolpolispaket; Slicktop-paket; Befälspaket; Trafikövervakningspaket; Transport-/fångpaket; Paket för civilbil; Annat
nb: Utstyrspakke for politibiler: Nærpolitipakke; Etterforsker-/administrativ pakke; Utrykningspakke for motorvei; Hundepatruljepakke; Uniformert patruljepakke; Pakke for utrykningskjøring; Skolepolitipakke; Pakke uten lysbro på taket; Innsatslederpakke; Trafikkpatruljepakke; Transport-/fangepakke; Sivilpakke; Annet
fr: Ensemble d’équipement du véhicule de police: Ensemble police de proximité; Ensemble détective/administratif; Ensemble patrouille routière; Ensemble unité canine (K-9); Ensemble patrouille identifiée; Ensemble homologué pour poursuites; Ensemble agent en milieu scolaire; Ensemble toit lisse (slicktop); Ensemble superviseur; Ensemble contrôle routier; Ensemble transport/prisonniers; Ensemble véhicule banalisé; Autre
pt-BR: Veículo policial pacote de equipamentos: Pacote de policiamento comunitário; Pacote investigativo/administrativo; Pacote de patrulha rodoviária; Pacote de unidade K-9; Pacote de patrulha caracterizada; Pacote para perseguição; Pacote de oficial de segurança escolar; Pacote de teto liso (slicktop); Pacote de supervisor; Pacote de fiscalização de trânsito; Pacote de transporte/prisioneiros; Pacote de veículo descaracterizado; Outros
pl: Pakiet wyposażenia pojazdu policyjnego: Pakiet dla policji prewencyjnej; Pakiet detektywistyczny/administracyjny; Pakiet dla patroli autostradowych; Pakiet dla jednostek K-9; Pakiet dla oznakowanych radiowozów; Pakiet pościgowy; Pakiet dla funkcjonariusza szkolnego; Pakiet Slicktop; Pakiet nadzorczy; Pakiet dla drogówki; Pakiet transportowy/dla więźniów; Pakiet dla nieoznakowanych radiowozów; Inne
vi: Gói trang thiết bị cho xe cảnh sát: Gói cảnh sát cộng đồng; Gói trinh sát/hành chính; Gói tuần tra đường cao tốc; Gói đơn vị K-9; Gói tuần tra có nhận diện; Gói tiêu chuẩn truy bắt; Gói sĩ quan an ninh trường học; Gói mui trơn; Gói giám sát viên; Gói cảnh sát giao thông; Gói vận chuyển/tù nhân; Gói không nhận diện; Khác
sl-SI: Paket opreme policijskega vozila: Paket za policijsko delo v skupnosti; Detektivski/administrativni paket; Paket za avtocestno patruljo; Paket za enoto K-9; Paket za označeno patruljo; Paket za zasledovanje; Paket za šolsko policijo; Paket s skritimi lučmi (slicktop); Nadzorniški paket; Paket za nadzor prometa; Paket za prevoz pripornikov; Paket za neoznačena vozila; Drugo
th: ชุดอุปกรณ์สำหรับรถตำรวจ: แพ็กเกจตำรวจชุมชนสัมพันธ์; แพ็กเกจสายสืบ/งานบริหาร; แพ็กเกจตำรวจทางหลวง; แพ็กเกจหน่วย K-9; แพ็กเกจรถสายตรวจมีตราสัญลักษณ์; แพ็กเกจมาตรฐานสกัดจับ; แพ็กเกจเจ้าหน้าที่ตำรวจประจำโรงเรียน; แพ็กเกจรถแบบไม่มีไซเรนหลังคา (slicktop); แพ็กเกจผู้บังคับบัญชา; แพ็กเกจตำรวจจราจร; แพ็กเกจขนส่ง/ผู้ต้องขัง; แพ็กเกจรถไม่มีตราสัญลักษณ์; อื่นๆ
da: Politibils-udstyrspakke: Nærpolitipakke; Efterforsknings-/administrationspakke; Færdselspolitipakke; Hundepatruljepakke; Pakke til patruljevogn med bemaling; Udrykningspakke; Skolepolitipakke; Slicktop-pakke; Lederpakke; Færdselskontrolpakke; Transport-/fangepakke; Pakke til civilvogn; Andet
pt-PT: Pacote de equipamento para viaturas policiais: Pacote de policiamento comunitário; Pacote de detetive/administrativo; Pacote de patrulha rodoviária; Pacote de unidade K-9; Pacote de patrulha caracterizada; Pacote classificado para perseguição; Pacote de agente escolar; Pacote sem barra de luzes; Pacote de supervisor; Pacote de controlo de trânsito; Pacote de transporte/prisioneiros; Pacote descaracterizado; Outro
lt-LT: Policijos transporto priemonės įrangos paketas: Bendruomenės policijos paketas; Detektyvų / administracijos paketas; Kelių policijos paketas; K-9 padalinio paketas; Žymėto patrulio paketas; Persekiojimo paketas; Mokyklos pareigūno paketas; „Slicktop“ paketas; Vadovo paketas; Eismo priežiūros paketas; Transportavimo / sulaikytųjų paketas; Nežymėtas paketas; Kita
el: Πακέτο εξοπλισμού αστυνομικών οχημάτων: Πακέτο κοινοτικής αστυνόμευσης; Πακέτο ερευνητή/διοικητικό; Πακέτο περιπολίας αυτοκινητοδρόμων; Πακέτο μονάδας K-9; Πακέτο περιπολίας με σήματα; Πακέτο καταδίωξης; Πακέτο αξιωματικού σχολείων; Πακέτο χωρίς μπάρα φάρων; Πακέτο επόπτη; Πακέτο ελέγχου τροχαίας; Πακέτο μεταφοράς/κρατουμένων; Πακέτο συμβατικού οχήματος; Άλλο
fi: Poliisiajoneuvon varustepaketti: Lähipoliisipaketti; Etsivä-/hallintopaketti; Maantiepoliisipaketti; Koirapoliisipaketti; Tunnuksellinen partiopaketti; Takaa-ajoluokiteltu paketti; Koulupoliisipaketti; Slicktop-paketti; Esihenkilöpaketti; Liikennevalvontapaketti; Kuljetus-/vankipaketti; Tunnukseton paketti; Muu
sk-SK: Balík vybavenia policajného vozidla: Balík pre komunitnú políciu; Balík pre detektívov/administratívu; Balík pre diaľničnú hliadku; Balík pre jednotku K-9; Balík pre označené hliadky; Balík na stíhanie; Balík pre školského policajta; Balík Slicktop; Balík pre dozorcu; Balík na kontrolu dopravy; Balík na transport/väzňov; Balík pre neoznačené vozidlá; Iné
hr-HR: Paket opreme za policijsko vozilo: Paket za rad policije u zajednici; Inspektorski/administrativni paket; Paket za prometnu policiju; Paket za K-9 jedinicu; Paket za označena patrolna vozila; Paket odobren za potjere; Paket za školskog policajca; Slicktop paket (bez krovne rotirke); Nadzornički paket; Paket za nadzor prometa; Paket za prijevoz zatvorenika; Paket za neoznačena vozila; Ostalo
zh-CN: 警用车辆设备套件: 社区警务套件; 刑侦/行政套件; 高速公路巡逻套件; 警犬单位套件; 有标识巡逻套件; 追捕级套件; 学校驻校警官套件; 无顶灯套件; 主管套件; 交通执法套件; 运输/囚犯套件; 无标识套件; 其他
de: Ausstattungspaket für Polizeifahrzeuge: Community-Policing-Paket; Kriminal-/Verwaltungspaket; Autobahnpolizei-Paket; Hundestaffel-Paket; Markiertes Streifenwagen-Paket; Für Verfolgungsjagden zugelassenes Paket; Schulpolizei-Paket; Slicktop-Paket; Einsatzleiter-Paket; Verkehrsüberwachungs-Paket; Transport-/Gefangenenpaket; Zivilfahrzeug-Paket; Sonstige
bg-BG: Пакет оборудване за полицейски автомобил: Оборудване за квартална полиция; Детективско/административно оборудване; Оборудване за магистрална полиция; Оборудване за кинологично звено (K-9); Оборудване за маркиран патрул; Оборудване за преследване; Оборудване за училищен полицай; Оборудване без светлини на покрива; Оборудване за надзорници; Оборудване за пътен контрол; Оборудване за транспортиране/за задържани; Оборудване за немаркиран автомобил; Други
es: Paquete de equipamiento para vehículos policiales: Paquete de policía comunitaria; Paquete de detective/administrativo; Paquete de patrulla de carreteras; Paquete de unidad K-9; Paquete de patrulla rotulada; Paquete clasificado para persecuciones; Paquete para oficial de seguridad escolar; Paquete de techo liso; Paquete de supervisor; Paquete de control de tráfico; Paquete de transporte/prisioneros; Paquete sin rotular; Otro
hu: Rendőrségi jármű felszereltségi csomagja: Közösségi rendészeti csomag; Nyomozói/adminisztratív csomag; Autópálya-rendőrségi csomag; K-9 egység csomag; Jelölt járőrcsomag; Üldözésre alkalmas csomag; Iskolarendőr csomag; Fényhíd nélküli (slicktop) csomag; Parancsnoki csomag; Közlekedésrendészeti csomag; Szállító/fogolycsomag; Jelöletlen csomag; Egyéb
en: Police vehicle equipment package: Community policing package; Detective/administrative package; Highway patrol package; K-9 unit package; Marked patrol package; Pursuit-rated package; School resource officer package; Slicktop package; Supervisor package; Traffic enforcement package; Transport/prisoner package; Unmarked package; Other
nl: Politievoertuig uitrustingspakket: Wijkagent-pakket; Recherche-/administratief pakket; Snelwegpolitie-pakket; K9-eenheid-pakket; Gemarkeerd patrouille-pakket; Achtervolgingsgeschikt pakket; Schoolpolitie-pakket; Slicktop-pakket; Leidinggevende-pakket; Verkeershandhaving-pakket; Transport-/arrestantenpakket; Ongemarkeerd pakket; Overig
ja: 警察車両装備パッケージ: 地域警察用パッケージ; 刑事/管理用パッケージ; 高速道路パトロール用パッケージ; 警察犬部隊用パッケージ; パトロールカー用パッケージ (マークあり); 追跡対応パッケージ; 学校駐在警官用パッケージ; スリックトップパッケージ; 監督者用パッケージ; 交通取締り用パッケージ; 護送用パッケージ; 覆面パトカー用パッケージ (マークなし); その他
cs: Balíček vybavení policejního vozidla: Paket pro pořádkovou policii; Paket pro detektivy/administrativu; Paket dálniční hlídky; Paket jednotky K-9; Paket označeného hlídkového vozu; Paket pro stíhací vozidla; Paket pro školní ostrahu; Paket bez střešní rampy; Paket pro velitele; Paket pro dopravní policii; Paket pro přepravu/vězně; Paket neoznačeného vozu; Jiné